Washington statutes.
RCW 7.42.010

Obscene prints and articles—Jurisdiction to enjoin.

The superior courts shall have jurisdiction to enjoin the sale or distribution of obscene prints and articles as hereinafter specified.

[ 1959 c 105 s 1.]